Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4932
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Revenue, in consultation with the Governor and the Department of Economic Development, may, but is not required to, adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations determined by the Tax Commissioner in his or her discretion to be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Quality Jobs Act.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 32;

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 47.